test/src/morphology/V-erota_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - erota: # Verb 'to differ / erota' - full paradigm
     erota+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: eruon
     erota+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: eruot
     erota+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: eruou
     erota+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: eruommo
     erota+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: eruotto
     erota+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: erotah
     erota+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: eruo
                      
     erota+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: eroin
     erota+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: eroit
     erota+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: eroi
     erota+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: eroimmo
     erota+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: eroitto
     erota+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: erottih
     erota+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: eronnuh
     erota+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: erottu
